Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 6. Liability of Real Estate to Debts.

§ 64.2-532.
Real estate of decedent as assets for payment of debts.

If a decedent’s personal estate is insufficient to satisfy the decedent’s debts and lawful demands against his estate, all real estate of the decedent, including such real estate that remains after satisfying the debts with which the real estate was charged or was subject to under the decedent’s will, are assets for the payment of the decedent’s debts and all lawful demands against his estate. A decedent’s real estate shall be applied to his debts and lawful demands against his estate in the same order that the personal estate of a decedent is applied pursuant to §

64.2-528

.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-171; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-181; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts and estates for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1970).

For comment on a personal representative’s power to sell realty in Virginia, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 949 (1974).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-823 General Creditor’s Complaint Against Estate of Decedent; No. 15-219 Clause Charging Debts and Legacies Against Real Property, et seq.; No. 16-2006 Indemnity and Escrow Agreement for Sale of Real Estate by Heirs of Intestate Decedent, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 54, 88, 92, 120, 130, 139; 14A M.J. Partition, § 50.

§ 64.2-533.
Administration of assets for payment of debts.

The circuit court in which a report of the accounts of a decedent’s personal representative and of the debts and demands against the decedent’s estate is or may be filed may administer the real estate of the decedent in the possession of the decedent’s personal representative that is an asset for the payment of the decedent’s debts and demands against the decedent’s estate, or any circuit court may administer such real estate.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-172; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-182; 2012, c. 614.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, § 54.

§ 64.2-534.
Liability of heir or devisee for value of real estate sold and conveyed; validity of premature conveyances.

Any heir or devisee who sells and conveys any real estate that is an asset for the payment of a decedent’s debts or lawful demands against his estate pursuant to §

64.2-532

is liable for the value of such real estate, with interest, to those persons entitled to be paid out of the real estate.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the real estate sold or conveyed is not liable to those persons entitled to be paid out of the real estate provided that (i) the sale was made more than one year after the death of the decedent, (ii) the conveyance was bona fide, and (iii) at the time of such conveyance, no action has been commenced for the administration of the real estate and no reports have been filed of the debts and demands of such creditors.

No sale and conveyance of such real estate made by an heir or devisee within one year after the death of the decedent is valid against creditors of such decedent, except as otherwise provided in §

64.2-535

, provided that any sale and conveyance made within one year after the death of a decedent is valid against creditors as if it were made more than one year after the death of the decedent if no action has been commenced for the administration of the real estate and no report of the debts and demands has been filed within one year after the death of the decedent.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-173; 1950, p. 606; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-183; 2012, c. 614; 2015, c. 332.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 332 substituted subsection B for the second sentence of subsection A, which read “However, the heir or devisee is not liable to such persons provided that (i) the conveyance was bona fide, and (ii) at the time of such conveyance, no action has been commenced for the administration of the real estate and no reports have been filed of the debts and demands of such creditors.”; redesignated former subsection B as subsection C and deleted “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A,” at the beginning; and substituted “§

64.2-535

, provided that any sale” for “§

64.2-535

. C. Any sale.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 120, 130.

§ 64.2-535.
When sale and conveyance within one year valid against creditors; proceeds paid to special commissioner; bond to obtain proceeds.

For purposes of this section:“Net proceeds” means the purchase price for the real estate, including money, deferred purchase money obligations, and other securities, remaining after the payment of the expenses of sale ordinarily paid by the seller in sales of such real estate and the discharge of indebtedness and encumbrances that the real estate is primarily liable for by law.

Any sale and conveyance of real estate that is an asset for the payment of a decedent’s debts or lawful demands against his estate pursuant to §

64.2-532

made within one year after the death of the decedent is valid against creditors of such decedent, if such real estate is sold and conveyed pursuant to a decree of a court of competent jurisdiction in an action for partition, sale of lands of persons under a disability, or other judicial sale, and the net proceeds of sale are paid to a special commissioner appointed by the court.

The special commissioner shall hold the net proceeds paid to him in lieu of the real estate subject to the claims of the decedent’s creditors in the same manner and to the same extent as such real estate would have been if not sold until at least one year after the death of the decedent. If no claim has been asserted against the net proceeds, the special commissioner shall distribute the net proceeds to those creditors entitled thereto in proportion to their interest in the real estate upon (i) the expiration of the one-year period or (ii) at any time within the one-year period upon posting bond with such surety as may be prescribed by the court to secure any claims against the real estate or net proceeds.

A purchaser of any real estate sold and conveyed in accordance with this section is not required to see to the application of the purchase money.

The special commissioner who receives and holds such net proceeds or refunding bond shall give such bond as required by the court appointing him.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-173.1; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-184; 1996, c. 65; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-515 Decree Confirming Sale — On Private Offer; No. 15-465 Refunding Bond; No. 16-512 Deed by Heirs.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partition, § 50.

§ 64.2-536.
Liability of heir or devisee; action by personal representative or creditor; recording notice of lis pendens; evidence.

An heir or devisee may be sued by the personal representative or any creditor to whom a claim is due for which the estate descended or devised is liable, or for which the heir or devisee is liable with regard to such estate. Any judgment for such a claim entered against the personal representative of the decedent is prima facie evidence of the claim against the heir or devisee in a suit against the heir or devisee by the personal representative or any creditor. In any suit by the personal representative or any creditor pursuant to this article, he shall record a notice of lis pendens as required by §

8.01-268

at the time of filing such suit. The personal representative or creditor has the burden to show to the satisfaction of the court that there are not sufficient personal assets in the estate to satisfy all claims against the estate.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-174; 1968, cc. 515, 656, § 64.1-185; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For comment on a personal representative’s power to sell realty in Virginia, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 949 (1974).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 120, 130, 140, 143, 144.

§ 64.2-537.
Action to enforce claim of less than $100; notice.

No action may be brought pursuant to this article where the amount of the claim does not exceed $100, unless, at least 30 days before the action was filed, the person or estate that is liable has been given notice that such action would be brought if the amount of the claim was not paid within such time.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-175; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-186; 2012, c. 614; 2014, c. 532.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 532 substituted “$100” for “$20.”

§ 64.2-538.
Lien acquired during lifetime of decedent not affected.

This article shall not affect any lien acquired during the lifetime of the decedent.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-176; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-187; 2012, c. 614.